Utah statutes.
53A-1a-808.   Board to make rules.

(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the board shall make rules consistent with this part:

(a)  establishing the application process for the scholarship program, including procedures to allow a parent to apply for a scholarship online;

(b)  establishing how the income of a scholarship student's parents shall be determined and verified; and

(c)  implementing Section 53A-1a-807.

(2)  By May 15, 2007, the board shall adopt rules establishing:

(a)  the application process for private schools and scholarship students; and

(b)  how the income of a scholarship student's parents shall be determined.

